apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__ùczi">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sz</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>më</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__piszë">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>më</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__miôł">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ôł</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ała</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ało</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elë</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ałë</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ała</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ała</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ôłbë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ałabë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>abë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ãbë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ałobë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elëbë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ałëbë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>abë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ãbë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ałabë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ałabë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__szedł">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szedł</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szła</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szło</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szlë</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szła</l>
          <r><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szedłbë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szłabë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szłobë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szlëbë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>szłabë</l>
          <r><s n="cni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- vbser -->
    <pardef n="/bëc__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bëc</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <!-- Present -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jem</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jes</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jesmë</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jesma</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jesta</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jesce</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>są</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mdzã</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mdze</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__ùczi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mdzą</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bë</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__pòmògł"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>béł</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bãdąc</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bãdąc</l>
          <r>bëc<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__jasny"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bëc"><par n="/bëc__vbser"/></e>
